District of Columbia statutes.
1-623.43

Compensation leave.

Any employee who has used leave as a result of a job-related injury or occupational disease or illness approved by the District government may have such leave restored to his or her credit in accordance with rules and regulations established by the Mayor.

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 2343, 25 DCR 5740
Aug. 7, 1980, D.C. Law 3-81, § 2(dd), 27 DCR 2632
1981 Ed., § 1-624.43.
1973 Ed., § 1-353.43.